Illinois, session 104th, HB21.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/2)  (from Ch. 116, par. 202)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    (a) "Public body" means all legislative, executive, 9administrative, or advisory bodies of the State, state 10universities and colleges, counties, townships, cities, 11villages, incorporated towns, school districts and all other 12municipal corporations, boards, bureaus, committees, or 13commissions of this State, any subsidiary bodies of any of the 14foregoing including but not limited to committees and 15subcommittees thereof, and a School Finance Authority created 16under Article 1E of the School Code. "Public body" does not 17include a child death review team or the Illinois Child Death 18Review Teams Executive Council established under the Child 19Death Review Team Act, or a regional youth advisory board or 20the Statewide Youth Advisory Board established under the 21Department of Children and Family Services Statewide Youth 22Advisory Board Act.23    (b) "Person" means any individual, corporation,   HB0021- 2 -LRB104 03139 BDA 13160 b1partnership, firm, organization or association, acting 2individually or as a group.3    (c) "Public records" means all records, reports, forms, 4writings, letters, memoranda, books, papers, maps, 5photographs, microfilms, cards, tapes, recordings, electronic 6data processing records, electronic communications, recorded 7information and all other documentary materials pertaining to 8the transaction of public business, regardless of physical 9form or characteristics, having been prepared by or for, or 10having been or being used by, received by, in the possession 11of, or under the control of any public body. "Public records" 12does not include junk mail. 13    (c-5) "Private information" means unique identifiers, 14including a person's social security number, driver's license 15number, employee identification number, biometric identifiers, 16personal financial information, passwords or other access 17codes, medical records, home or personal telephone numbers, 18and personal email addresses. Private information also 19includes home address and personal license plates, except as 20otherwise provided by law or when compiled without possibility 21of attribution to any person. For a public body that is a 22HIPAA-covered entity, "private information" includes 23electronic medical records and all information, including 24demographic information, contained within or extracted from an 25electronic medical records system operated or maintained by 26the public body in compliance with State and federal medical   HB0021- 3 -LRB104 03139 BDA 13160 b1privacy laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, 2the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and 3its regulations, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this 4subsection, "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to 5the term "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103.6    (c-10) "Commercial purpose" means the use of any part of a 7public record or records, or information derived from public 8records, in any form for sale, resale, or solicitation or 9advertisement for sales or services. For purposes of this 10definition, requests made by news media and non-profit, 11scientific, or academic organizations shall not be considered 12to be made for a "commercial purpose" when the principal 13purpose of the request is (i) to access and disseminate 14information concerning news and current or passing events, 15(ii) for articles of opinion or features of interest to the 16public, or (iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or 17public research or education.18    (d) "Copying" means the reproduction of any public record 19by means of any photographic, electronic, mechanical or other 20process, device or means now known or hereafter developed and 21available to the public body.22    (e) "Head of the public body" means the president, mayor, 23chairman, presiding officer, director, superintendent, 24manager, supervisor or individual otherwise holding primary 25executive and administrative authority for the public body, or 26such person's duly authorized designee.  HB0021- 4 -LRB104 03139 BDA 13160 b1    (f) "News media" means a newspaper or other periodical 2issued at regular intervals whether in print or electronic 3format, a news service whether in print or electronic format, 4a radio station, a television station, a television network, a 5community antenna television service, or a person or 6corporation engaged in making news reels or other motion 7picture news for public showing.8    (g) "Recurrent requester", as used in Section 3.2 of this 9Act, means a person that, in the 12 months immediately 10preceding the request, has submitted to the same public body 11(i) a minimum of 50 requests for records, (ii) a minimum of 15 12requests for records within a 30-day period, or (iii) a 13minimum of 7 requests for records within a 7-day period. For 14purposes of this definition, requests made by news media and 15non-profit, scientific, or academic organizations shall not be 16considered in calculating the number of requests made in the 17time periods in this definition when the principal purpose of 18the requests is (i) to access and disseminate information 19concerning news and current or passing events, (ii) for 20articles of opinion or features of interest to the public, or 21(iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or public 22research or education.23    For the purposes of this subsection (g), "request" means a 24written document (or oral request, if the public body chooses 25to honor oral requests) that is submitted to a public body via 26personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other   HB0021- 5 -LRB104 03139 BDA 13160 b1means available to the public body and that identifies the 2particular public record the requester seeks. One request may 3identify multiple records to be inspected or copied. 4    (h) "Voluminous request" means a request that: (i) 5includes more than 5 individual requests for more than 5 6different categories of records or a combination of individual 7requests that total requests for more than 5 different 8categories of records in a period of 20 business days; or (ii) 9requires the compilation of more than 500 letter or 10legal-sized pages of public records unless a single requested 11record exceeds 500 pages. "Single requested record" may 12include, but is not limited to, one report, form, e-mail, 13letter, memorandum, book, map, microfilm, tape, or recording.14    "Voluminous request" does not include a request made by 15news media and non-profit, scientific, or academic 16organizations if the principal purpose of the request is: (1) 17to access and disseminate information concerning news and 18current or passing events; (2) for articles of opinion or 19features of interest to the public; or (3) for the purpose of 20academic, scientific, or public research or education.21    For the purposes of this subsection (h), "request" means a 22written document, or oral request, if the public body chooses 23to honor oral requests, that is submitted to a public body via 24personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 25means available to the public body and that identifies the 26particular public record or records the requester seeks. One   HB0021- 6 -LRB104 03139 BDA 13160 b1request may identify multiple individual records to be 2inspected or copied. 3    (i) "Severance agreement" means a mutual agreement between 4any public body and its employee for the employee's 5resignation in exchange for payment by the public body. 6    (j) "Junk mail" means (i) any unsolicited commercial mail 7sent to a public body and not responded to by an official, 8employee, or agent of the public body or (ii) any unsolicited 9commercial electronic communication sent to a public body and 10not responded to by an official, employee, or agent of the 11public body. 12(Source: P.A. 103-554, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    Section 10. The Local Records Act is amended by changing 14Section 3 as follows: 15    (50 ILCS 205/3)  (from Ch. 116, par. 43.103)16    Sec. 3. Except where the context indicates otherwise, the 17terms used in this Act are defined as follows:18    "Agency" means any court, and all parts, boards, 19departments, bureaus and commissions of any county, municipal 20corporation or political subdivision.21    "Archivist" means the Secretary of State.22    "Born-digital electronic material" means electronic 23material created in digital form rather than converted from 24print or analog form to digital form.  HB0021- 7 -LRB104 03139 BDA 13160 b1    "Commission" means a Local Records Commission.2    "Court" means a court, other than the Supreme Court.3    "Digitized electronic material" means electronic material 4converted from print or analog form to digital form. 5    "Junk mail" means (i) any unsolicited commercial mail sent 6to a public body and not responded to by an official, employee, 7or agent of the public body or (ii) any unsolicited commercial 8electronic communication sent to a public body and not 9responded to by an official, employee, or agent of the public 10body. 11    "Officer" means any elected or appointed official of a 12court, county, municipal corporation or political subdivision.13    "Public record" means any book, paper, map, photograph, 14born-digital electronic material, digitized electronic 15material, electronic material with a combination of digitized 16and born-digital material, or other official documentary 17material, regardless of physical form or characteristics, 18made, produced, executed or received by any agency or officer 19pursuant to law or in connection with the transaction of 20public business and preserved or appropriate for preservation 21by such agency or officer, or any successor thereof, as 22evidence of the organization, function, policies, decisions, 23procedures, or other activities thereof, or because of the 24informational data contained therein. Library and museum 25material made or acquired and preserved solely for reference 26or exhibition purposes, extra copies of documents preserved   HB0021- 8 -LRB104 03139 BDA 13160 b1only for convenience of reference, and stocks of publications 2and of processed documents, and junk mail are not included 3within the definition of public record. Paper copies of 4registration records, as defined in Section 1 of the Library 5Records Confidentiality Act (75 ILCS 70/1), shall not be 6considered public records once the information contained in 7the paper registration records is transferred into a secure 8electronic format and checked for accuracy. 9(Source: P.A. 99-147, eff. 1-1-16.)